Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1598.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 471.9998, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-00082 471.9998 MERCHANT BAGS. Subdivision 1. Merchant option. All merchants, itinerant vendors, and peddlers doing business in this state shall have the option to provide customers a paper, plastic, or reusable bag for the packaging of any item or good purchased, provided such purchase is of a size and manner commensurate with the use of paper, plastic, or reusable bags. Subd. 2. Prohibition; bag ban. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no political subdivision shall impose any ban upon the use of paper, plastic, or reusable bags for packaging of any item or good purchased from a merchant, itinerant vendor, or peddler.